Massachusetts, session 194th, H1351.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 118E of General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition is hereby
amended by inserting after section 62 the following section:-
Section 63. The Division shall cover the cost of habilitative and rehabilitative medically
necessary treatments for individuals aged 21 and older who are receiving coverage under this
chapter and who have been diagnosed with any of the following disorders as defined in the most
recent version of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders (DSM):
developmental disability, an intellectual disability, or autism spectrum disorder. The diagnoses
must be made by a licensed physician or a licensed psychologist who determines the care to be
medically necessary. Treatments shall include, but shall not be limited to, applied behavior
of 2

analysis provided or supervised by a licensed behavior analyst that is necessary to develop,
maintain or restore, to the maximum extent practicable, the functioning of an individual. In
addition, the Division shall cover the cost of both dedicated and non-dedicated augmentative and
alternative communication devices, including, but not limited to, medically necessary tablets.
of 2